apertium-ita.ita.dix
<pardef n="affi/ggere__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ggeremmo</l>  <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggerei</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggereste</l>  <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggeresti</l>  <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggerebber</l> <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggerebbero</l><r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggerebbe</l>  <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggeremo</l>   <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggerò</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggerete</l>   <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggerai</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggeran</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggeranno</l>  <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggerà</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggendo</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggendo</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggemmo</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssi</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggeste</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggesti</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sser</l>      <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssero</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sse</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggiamo</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggiamo</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantiamo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggete</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggete</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggi</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggi</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggan</l>      <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggano</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gga</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gger</l>      <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggere</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gger</l>      <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggevamo</l>   <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggevo</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggevate</l>   <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggevi</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggevan</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggevano</l>   <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggeva</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggessimo</l>  <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggessi</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggeste</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggessi</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggesser</l>   <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggessero</l>  <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggesse</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantate"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tta</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tta</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantata"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tti</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tti</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantati"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tto</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tto</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantato"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggiamo</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggo</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggete</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggi</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggon</l>      <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggono</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gge</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggiamo</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gga</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggiate</l>    <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gga</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggan</l>      <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggano</l>     <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gga</l>       <r>ggere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  

<e lm="affiggere">       <i>affi</i><par n="affi/ggere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="affliggere">      <i>affli</i><par n="affi/ggere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="friggere">        <i>fri</i><par n="affi/ggere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reggere">         <i>re</i><par n="affi/ggere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sconfiggere">     <i>sconfi</i><par n="affi/ggere__vblex"/></e>
